Tennessee, session 114, SB2296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is established a task force for educational leadership composed of
members of the general assembly selected by the speakers, representatives from the
office of the governor selected by the governor, representatives from the department of
education selected by the commissioner, and the attorney general and reporter that is
empowered to compel information from state agencies.
(b) The task force shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days from the effective
date of this act, publish a comprehensive plan to assume full responsibility for education
programs currently administered by the United States department of education,
including, but not limited to, Title funds, special education, and civil rights.
(c) The comprehensive plan must include, at a minimum:
- 2 - 011875

(1) Statutory changes required to assume administrative control over
federal education programs;
(2) Recommended waivers, transfers, or block grants to be requested
from the federal government;
(3) Identification of federal education mandates that the state will decline
to administer on grounds that the mandate should not be statutorily required; and
(4) Legislation suitable for immediate introduction.
(d) The department of education shall, within sixty (60) days of the effective date
of this act, conduct an inventory of all existing federal education programs and grants
administered by this state, including the funding amounts, statutory authority, and
reporting requirements, and submit the inventory to the general assembly.
(e) The attorney general and reporter shall, within sixty (60) days of the effective
date of this act, conduct a review of all state statutes and rules that reference or
incorporate federal education statutes or regulations.
(f) Members of the general assembly serving on the task force shall introduce
legislation to implement the comprehensive plan within sixty (60) days following the date
on which the comprehensive plan is published, or when the general assembly next
convenes in a regular session, whichever occurs first.
(g) If the general assembly fails to enact legislation to implement the
comprehensive plan within one (1) year of its publication, the department of education
shall administratively implement recommendations of the comprehensive plan that do
not require statutory changes, to the extent permitted by law.
(h) The task force may cooperate with other states to pursue joint waiver
requests and coordinated negotiations with the United States department of education to
accelerate the return of educational authority to this state.
- 3 - 011875

(i) The department of education shall publish a report, no later than two (2) years
from the effective date of this act, using metrics specified in the comprehensive plan to
measure student outcomes, fiscal efficiency, and regulatory burdens, to allow the public
to compare outcomes under new state educational leadership relative to earlier periods
of federal education control.
(j) The task force for educational leadership ceases to exist the day after the
department of education publishes the report required in subsection (i).
SECTION 2.
A certified copy of this act shall be transmitted by the Secretary of State to the
President of the United States, the U.S. Secretary of Education, and each member of the
Tennessee Congressional delegation.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 011875